Wisconsin, session 2025, SB736.
do enact as follows:SB736,11Section 1. 440.26 (5) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB736,2,42440.26 (5) (bm) In this paragraph, “church” means a religious or faith-based 3body or organization that has a distinct legal existence, has a congregation, and 4regularly holds religious services.SB736,2,852. The license and permit requirements of this section do not apply to an 6individual serving as a volunteer for a church safety or security team while the 7individual is acting within the scope of his or her duties as a volunteer and is on the 8premises of the church.SB736,2,1193. The exemption under this paragraph extends only to the premises of a 10church’s place of worship and does not extend to the premises of a school or other 11entity or organization operated by or under the control of the church.SB736,2,1212